Tennessee statutes. Title 35 Fiduciaries And Trust Estates
Part 3

Representation

35-15-301. Representation — Basic effect.

Notice to a person who may represent and bind another person under this chapter has the same effect as if notice were given directly to the other person.

The consent of a person who may represent and bind another person under this chapter is binding on the person represented unless the person represented objects to the representation before the consent would otherwise have become effective.

Except as otherwise provided in §§ 35-15-411 and 35-15-602, a person who under this chapter may represent a settlor who lacks capacity may receive notice and give a binding consent on the settlor's behalf.

A settlor may not represent and bind a beneficiary under this chapter with respect to the termination or modification of a trust under § 35-15-411(a).

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 18; 2007, ch. 24, § 10.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Uniform Trust Code: New Formulation for a Trusty Tool (Marshall H. Peterson), 41 No. 1 Tenn. B.J. 24 (2005).

35-15-302. Representation by holder of power of appointment — “General power of appointment” defined.

To the extent there is no material conflict of interest between the holder of a power of appointment and the persons represented with respect to the particular question or dispute, the holder may represent and bind persons whose interests, as permissible appointees, takers in default, or otherwise, are subject to the power. Notwithstanding this section to the contrary, the holder of any general power of appointment may, regardless of whether there is a material conflict of interest between the holder of such general power of appointment and the persons represented with respect to the particular question or dispute, represent and bind persons whose interests, as permissible appointees, takers in default, or otherwise, are subject to such power.

As used in this section, “general power of appointment” means a power, regardless of when exercisable, to appoint in favor of any one (1) or more of the following: such power holder, such power holder's creditors, such power holder's estate, and the creditors of the estate of such power holder.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) to the contrary, if the holder, under the terms of the governing instrument, may only exercise such general power of appointment with the consent of another person, then the written consent of such other person is required in order for the holder of the general power of appointment to represent and bind persons whose interests, as permissible appointees, takers in default, or otherwise, are subject to the power.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 19; 2010, ch. 725, § 3; 2012, ch. 886, § 11; 2019, ch. 340, § 13.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment added the second sentence in (a)(1), and added (a)(2) and (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, ch. 340, § 20. May 10, 2019.

35-15-303. Representation by fiduciaries and parents.

To the extent there is no material conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented or among those being represented with respect to a particular question or dispute:

A conservator may represent and bind the estate that the conservator controls;

A guardian may represent and bind the ward if a conservator of the ward's estate has not been appointed;

An agent having authority to act with respect to the particular question or dispute may represent and bind the principal;

A trustee may represent and bind the beneficiaries of the trust;

A personal representative of a decedent's estate may represent and bind persons interested in the estate;

A person may represent and bind the person's minor or unborn descendant if a guardian for the descendant has not been appointed;

A person designated by the settlor in the trust instrument or in a writing delivered to the trustee to represent the beneficiaries of the trust may represent and bind such beneficiaries; and

A person designated by the beneficiaries of the trust to represent them may represent and bind such beneficiaries.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 20; 2007, ch. 24, §§ 11, 12; 2010, ch. 725, § 4.

Law Reviews.

Agents in Secrecy: The Use of Information Surrogates in Trust Administration (Lauren Z. Curry), 64 Vand. L. Rev. 925 (2011).

35-15-304. Representation by person having substantially identical interest.

Unless otherwise represented, a minor, incapacitated, or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown and not reasonably ascertainable, may be represented by and bound by another having a substantially identical interest with respect to the particular question or dispute, but only to the extent there is no material conflict of interest between the representative and the person represented.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 21; 2010, ch. 725, § 5.

35-15-305. Appointment of representative.

If the court determines that an interest is not represented under this chapter, or that the otherwise available representation might be inadequate, the court may appoint a representative to receive notice, give consent, and otherwise represent, bind, and act on behalf of a minor, incapacitated, or unborn individual, or a person whose identity or location is unknown. A representative may be appointed to represent several persons or interests.

A representative may act on behalf of the individual represented with respect to any matter arising under this chapter, whether or not a judicial proceeding concerning the trust is pending.

In making decisions, a representative may consider general benefit accruing to the living members of the individual's family.

Acts 2004, ch. 537, § 22.